North Carolina, session 2025, SB503.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 130A-118 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) The Office of Vital Records and each local register of deeds office shall process each
request for amendment of a certificate of birth or death within 30 calendar days after the date the
office receives the appropriate completed application, any required proof, and payment of any
applicable fee for the amendment."
SECTION 1.(b) Subsection (a) of this section applies to birth and death certificate
amendment requests made on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 2.(a) Notwithstanding any policy implemented by the Office of State
Human Resources or the Department of Health and Human Services, or any provision of State
law to the contrary, employees of the Office of Vital Records are not permitted to telework if
doing so will adversely impact the time line provided in G.S. 130A-118(a1), unless telework is
determined to be necessary by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services
during any period of time when there is a declared disaster or emergency pursuant to Chapter
166A of the General Statutes. As used in this section, the term "telework" means to use the
internet, email, or telephone to perform work duties at a location other than an assigned primary
workstation.
SECTION 2.(b) Subsection (a) of this section applies to all permanent and
temporary employees of the Office of Vital Records.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S503-v-2*